Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 1. General Benefits
§ 1301a.
Department of Labor; composition.

The Department of Labor, created by

3 V.S.A. § 212

, shall consist of a Commissioner of Labor, the Vermont Employment Security Board, the Vermont Workforce Development Division, the Economic and Labor Market Information Division, the Workforce Development Council, the Unemployment Insurance and Wages Division, and the Workers’ Compensation and Safety Division. The Chair of the Employment Security Board shall be the Commissioner of Labor ex officio. The Deputy Commissioner of Labor or a designee chosen by the Commissioner may serve as Chair in the absence of the Commissioner as the Commissioner’s designee.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.) § 20, eff. March 1, 1961; amended

1981, No. 66

, § 2, eff. May 1, 1981;

2005, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. May 29, 2006;

2011, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § E.401.11.

§ 1301b.
Repealed. 2001, No. 142, § 302c.

§ 1302.
Vermont Employment Security Board, composition, duties.

There is hereby created a board of three members to be known as the Vermont Employment Security Board. The members of the Board shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate. The term of each member shall be six years. Biennially, in the month of February, with the advice and consent of the Senate, the Governor shall appoint a person as a member of such Board for the term of six years, whose term of office shall commence March 1 of the year in which such appointment is made. Any appointment to a vacancy shall be for the unexpired term. In case of a vacancy by resignation, the member resigning shall continue in office until his or her successor is appointed. No more than two members of the Board shall be members of the same political party. Biennially, in the month of February, the Governor shall designate a member of such board to be its chair. The Governor may at any time remove a member of such Board for gross inefficiency, neglect of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office.

The Board may hear and decide all matters appealed to it under this chapter. It shall determine its own methods of procedure. It may, with the approval of the Governor, adopt, amend, suspend, or rescind such rules and regulations as it considers necessary and consistent with this chapter. The rules and regulations of the Board shall have the force and effect of law after public hearing thereon of which reasonable notice has been given, and after filing with the Secretary of State, and publication in such manner as the Board shall prescribe. The Board may administer oaths, take depositions, certify to official acts, and subpoena witnesses and compel the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records necessary and material in the discharge of its duties imposed by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 1, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1303.
Compensation.

The Commissioner of Labor shall be paid an annual salary, as provided by

32 V.S.A. § 1003

and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the Commissioner’s duties.
Each other member of the Board shall be paid a per diem fixed by the Emergency Board while engaged in work connected with his or her official duties and shall be entitled to his or her actual and necessary expenses when away from home in discharge of such duties.
All vouchers for salary, per diem, or expenses of a member shall be approved by the other members of the Board before payment thereof.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 2, eff. July 11, 1961;

1981, No. 66

, § 5(b), eff. May 1, 1981;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 1304.
Quorum.

Any two members of the Board shall constitute a quorum to transact business.
No vacancy shall impair the right of the remaining members to exercise all of the powers of the Board, as long as a majority remain.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 3, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1305.
Divisions; Comprehensive Employment and Training Office.

There is hereby established within the Department of Labor, the Vermont Employment Service Division, the Unemployment Compensation Division, and the Comprehensive Employment and Training Office.
Each division and office shall be responsible for the discharge of its distinctive function. Each division and office shall be so far as is practicable a separate administrative unit with respect to personnel, budget, and duties.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. March 1, 1961;

1981, No. 66

, § 3, eff. May 1, 1981;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 1305a.
Comprehensive Employment and Training Office.

With the approval of the Governor, the Commissioner shall appoint a Director of the Comprehensive Employment and Training Office and fix his or her salary. The Director shall serve at the pleasure of the Commissioner. The Commissioner may appoint such other personnel and may organize the Office as he or she deems necessary to carry out its functions and duties, and may delegate such powers and authority to the Director of the Office as he or she deems necessary for its efficient administration.

The Comprehensive Employment and Training Office shall provide job training and employment opportunities for economically disadvantaged, unemployed, and underemployed persons through a system of federal and State programs, and is hereby authorized to serve on behalf of the Governor, through the Commissioner of Labor, as the prime sponsor in accordance with the Comprehensive Employment and Training Act (P.L. 95-524); provided further, that such responsibilities and authorization shall continue only so long as the federal government provides funds to execute such responsibilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 66

, § 4, eff. May 1, 1981; amended

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 1305b.
Repealed. 1995, No. 45, § 4.

§ 1306.
Advisory Council; members; terms.

The Governor shall appoint a State Department of Labor Advisory Council composed of eight members from the general public to include four employer representatives and four employee representatives who may fairly be regarded as employees because of their vocations, employment, and affiliations. Appointment of the four employee representatives, at least one of whom shall have experience in workers’ compensation law and one of whom shall be a member of a building trade, shall be made from a list of qualified individuals submitted by the Vermont State Labor Council, the Vermont State Employees’ Association, and the Vermont National Education Association. Appointment of the four employer representatives shall be made from a list of qualified individuals submitted by the Vermont Chamber of Commerce, Associated General Contractors of Vermont, and Vermont Businesses for Social Responsibility. The Council members shall be appointed for staggered terms of four years. The Council shall meet at least three times a year.

The Council shall advise the Commissioner regarding formulating policies by discussing the problems related to the functions and duties of the Department in order to develop impartial solutions and approaches to these issues.

The Commissioner may establish subcommittees composed solely of labor or management representatives and use a portion of the Council’s meeting time to meet with these subcommittees.

Each member of the Council who is not a salaried official or State employee or is not otherwise compensated through employment for attending Council meetings is entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement for expenses as provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1969, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.);

2005, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 29, 2006;

2009, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 1307.
Commissioner of Labor, duties and powers of.

The Commissioner of Labor shall administer this chapter.
The Commissioner may employ such persons, make such expenditures, require such reports, make such investigations, and take such other action as he or she considers necessary or suitable to that end.
In the discharge of his or her duties imposed by this chapter, the Commissioner may administer oaths, take depositions, certify to official acts, and subpoena witnesses and compel the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records necessary and material to the administration of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 4, eff. July 11, 1961;

1981, No. 66

, § 5(b), eff. May 1, 1981;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 1308.
Organization.

The Commissioner shall determine his or her method of procedure in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1309.
Reports; solvency of Trust Fund.

On or before January 31 of each year, the Commissioner shall submit to the Governor and the Chairs of the Senate Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs and on Finance and the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development and on Ways and Means a report covering the administration and operation of this chapter during the preceding calendar year.
(a) (1) On or before January 31 of each year, the Commissioner shall submit to the Governor and the Chairs of the Senate Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs and on Finance and the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development and on Ways and Means a report covering the administration and operation of this chapter during the preceding calendar year.

The report shall include:

a balance sheet of the monies in the Fund and data as to probable reserve requirements based upon accepted actuarial principles, with respect to business activity, and other relevant factors for the longest available period;

recommendations for amendments of this chapter as the Board considers proper; and

an accounting of the amount of supplemental benefits paid to claimants pursuant to subdivision 1338(e)(2) of this chapter.

Whenever the Commissioner believes that the solvency of the Fund is in danger or the balance of the Fund drops below $180,000,000.00, the Commissioner shall promptly inform the Governor and the Chairs of the Senate Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs and on Finance and the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development and on Ways and Means and make recommendations for preserving an adequate level in the Trust Fund. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 5, eff. July 11, 1961;

2009, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 36;

2021, No. 51

, § 13, eff. June 1, 2021.

§ 1310.
Repealed.
1959, No. 329 (Adj. Sess.), § 59, eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 1311.
Employees.

Subject to other provisions of this chapter, the Commissioner is authorized to appoint a Deputy Commissioner and such officers, accountants, attorneys, and employees as may be necessary in the performance of his or her duties.
The Commissioner may delegate to any such person so appointed such power and authority deemed reasonable and proper for the effective administration of this chapter, and may, in the Commissioner’s discretion, bond any person handling monies or signing checks hereunder.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1971, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1985, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§ 1311a.
Professional training for employees.

The Commissioner, using grant funds made available by the United States, may, to the extent permitted and subject to the approval of the Governor, provide professional training for the Department’s employees by contracting with educational institutions for short courses or other forms of intensive instruction.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 137

, eff. April 22, 1959; amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1981, No. 66

, § 5(b), eff. May 1, 1981;

2021, No. 20

, § 219.

§ 1312.
Publication of rules, regulations, reports.

The Commissioner shall cause to be printed for distribution to the public the text of this chapter, the Board’s rules and regulations, his or her annual reports to the Governor, and any other material the Commissioner considers relevant and suitable. He or she shall furnish the same to any person upon application therefor.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 6, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1313.
Repealed. 2003, No. 122 (Adj. Sess.), § 294(o).

§ 1314.
Reports and records; separation information; determination of eligibility; failure to report employment information; disclosure of information to other State agencies to investigate misclassification or miscoding.

The Commissioner may require any employing unit to keep such true and accurate records and make such reports covering persons employed by it respecting employment, wages, hours, unemployment, and related matters as the Commissioner deems reasonably necessary for the effective administration of this chapter. Such records shall be open to inspection and subject to being copied by the Commissioner or his or her authorized representatives at any reasonable time and as often as may be necessary.

On request of the Commissioner, an employing unit shall report, within 10 days of the mailing or personal delivery of the request, employment and separation information with respect to a claimant and the wages paid to a claimant.

If an employing unit fails to comply adequately with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section and section 1314a of this title, the Commissioner shall determine the benefit rights of a claimant upon such information as is available. Prompt notice in writing of the determination shall be given to the employing unit. The determination shall be final with respect to a noncomplying employer as to any charges against its experience-rating record for benefits paid to the claimant before the week following the receipt of the employing unit’s reply. The employing unit’s experience rating record shall not be relieved of these charges, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, unless the Commissioner determines that failure to comply was due to unavoidable accident or mistake.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, information obtained from any employing unit or individual in the administration of this chapter and determinations as to the benefit rights of any individual shall be held confidential and shall not be disclosed or open to public inspection in any manner revealing the individual’s or employing unit’s identity, nor be admissible in evidence in any action or proceeding other than one arising out of this chapter, or to support or facilitate an investigation by a public agency identified in subdivision (e)(1) of this section.
(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, information obtained from any employing unit or individual in the administration of this chapter and determinations as to the benefit rights of any individual shall be held confidential and shall not be disclosed or open to public inspection in any manner revealing the individual’s or employing unit’s identity, nor be admissible in evidence in any action or proceeding other than one arising out of this chapter, or to support or facilitate an investigation by a public agency identified in subdivision (e)(1) of this section.

An individual or his or her duly authorized agent may be supplied with information from those records to the extent necessary for the proper presentation of his or her claims for benefits or to inform him or her of his or her existing or prospective rights to benefits; an employing unit may be furnished with such information as may be deemed proper, within the discretion of the Commissioner, to enable it to fully discharge its obligations and safeguard its rights under this chapter.

Automatic data processing services and systems and programming services within the Department of Labor shall be the responsibility and under the direct control of the Commissioner in the administration of this chapter and chapter 15 of this title.

Notwithstanding the provisions in subdivision (3) of this subsection, the Department of Labor shall, at the request of the Agency of Administration, perform such services for other departments and agencies of the State as are within the capacity of its data processing equipment and personnel, provided that such services can be accomplished without undue interference with the designated work of the Department of Labor.

Subject to such restrictions as the Board may by regulation prescribe, information from unemployment insurance records may be made available to any public officer or public agency of this or any other state or the federal government dealing with the administration or regulation of relief, public assistance, unemployment compensation, a system of public employment offices, wages and hours of employment, workers’ compensation, misclassification or miscoding of workers, occupational safety and health, or a public works program for purposes appropriate to the necessary operation of those offices or agencies. The Commissioner may also make information available to colleges, universities, and public agencies of the State for use in connection with research projects of a public service nature and to the Vermont Economic Progress Council with regard to the administration of 32 V.S.A. chapter 105, subchapter 2, but no person associated with those institutions or agencies may disclose that information in any manner that would reveal the identity of any individual or employing unit from or concerning whom the information was obtained by Commissioner.
(e) (1) Subject to such restrictions as the Board may by regulation prescribe, information from unemployment insurance records may be made available to any public officer or public agency of this or any other state or the federal government dealing with the administration or regulation of relief, public assistance, unemployment compensation, a system of public employment offices, wages and hours of employment, workers’ compensation, misclassification or miscoding of workers, occupational safety and health, or a public works program for purposes appropriate to the necessary operation of those offices or agencies. The Commissioner may also make information available to colleges, universities, and public agencies of the State for use in connection with research projects of a public service nature and to the Vermont Economic Progress Council with regard to the administration of 32 V.S.A. chapter 105, subchapter 2, but no person associated with those institutions or agencies may disclose that information in any manner that would reveal the identity of any individual or employing unit from or concerning whom the information was obtained by Commissioner.

The Department of Labor shall participate in the income and eligibility verification procedures under the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984, Pub. L. No. 98-369, which provides for the exchange of information among state agencies administering programs funded with federal monies provided under the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) block grant, Medicaid, Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), SSI, Unemployment Compensation, and any other state program under a plan approved under Title I, X, XIV, or XVI of the Social Security Act.

The Department of Labor is designated as the Vermont agency for the collection of wage records on workers covered under this chapter, as required by the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984, Pub. L. No. 98-369.

The Department of Labor shall disclose, upon request, to officers or employees of any state or local child support enforcement agency any wage information or other information material to the location of an individual, the individual’s assets, or the individual’s place of employment or other source of income contained in the Department’s unemployment compensation claim records with respect to an identified individual that is contained in those records.

The term “state or local child support enforcement agency” means any agency of a state or political subdivision thereof operating pursuant to a plan described in Section 454 of the Social Security Act, which has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services under part D, Title IV of the Social Security Act.

The requesting agency shall agree that information provided under this subsection is to be used only for the following purposes:

establishing and collecting child support obligations from, and locating, individuals owing such obligations that are being enforced pursuant to a plan described in Section 454 of the Social Security Act that has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services under part D, Title IV of the Social Security Act; and

establishing parentage and expediting procedures relating to establishing parentage pursuant to Section 466(c)(1) of the Social Security Act as added by Section 325(a)(2) of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Pub. L. 104-193.

The Department of Labor shall disclose, upon request, to officers and employees of the U.S. Department of Agriculture and any state agency, with respect to an identified individual, any of the following information that is contained in its records:
(3) (A) The Department of Labor shall disclose, upon request, to officers and employees of the U.S. Department of Agriculture and any state agency, with respect to an identified individual, any of the following information that is contained in its records:

wage information;

whether the individual is receiving, has received, or has made application for unemployment compensation and the amount of any compensation being received or to be received by such individual;

the current or most recent home address of the individual; and

whether the individual has refused an offer of employment and, if so, a description of the employment offered and the terms, conditions, and rate of pay therefor.

The term “state agency” means any agency described in

7 U.S.C. § 2012(s)

that administers the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program established under that act.

The requesting agency shall agree that such information shall be used only for purposes of determining the applicant’s eligibility for benefits, or the amount of benefits, under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program established under 7 U.S.C. chapter 51.

The information shall not be released unless the requesting agency agrees to reimburse the costs involved for furnishing such information.

In addition to the requirements of this subdivision, all other requirements with respect to confidentiality of information obtained in the administration of this chapter and the sanctions imposed for improper disclosure of information obtained in the administration of this chapter shall apply to the use of such information by the officers and employees of any state agency or the U.S. Department of Agriculture.

The Department of Labor shall disclose, upon request, to officers or employees of any state or local agency charged with administering TANF, any wage information with respect to an identified individual that is contained in its records, which is necessary for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligibility for aid or services or the amount of such aid or services to needy families with children.

The term “state or local agency charged with administering TANF” means any such agency administering a plan approved under part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act.

The information requested shall not be released unless the requesting TANF agency agrees to reimburse the Department of Labor for the costs involved in furnishing such information.

The requesting agency shall agree that the requested information shall be used only for the purposes authorized in subdivision (e)(4)(A) of this section.

The Department of Labor shall disclose to officers or employees of the Federal Parent Locator Service (FPLS) or National New Hire Directory any employment, wage, and unemployment compensation claim information contained in its claim records that may be useful in locating an absent parent or the parent’s employer solely for purposes of administering the child support enforcement provisions of Title IV of the Social Security Act.
(5) (A) The Department of Labor shall disclose to officers or employees of the Federal Parent Locator Service (FPLS) or National New Hire Directory any employment, wage, and unemployment compensation claim information contained in its claim records that may be useful in locating an absent parent or the parent’s employer solely for purposes of administering the child support enforcement provisions of Title IV of the Social Security Act.

The requesting Federal Parent Locator Service shall agree that the requested information shall be used only for purposes authorized in Section 303(h)(1) of the Social Security Act.

The information requested shall not be released unless the requesting Federal Parent Locator Service agrees to reimburse the Department of Labor for the costs involved in furnishing the requested information.

The Department of Labor shall disclose, upon request, to officers or employees of the Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) and to representatives of a public housing agency any wage information and unemployment compensation benefit information that is contained in its records with respect to an identified individual applying for or participating in any housing assistance program administered by HUD that is necessary for the purposes of determining the individual’s eligibility for benefits or the amount of benefits under a HUD housing assistance program. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term “public housing agency” means any agency described in section 3(b)(6) of the U.S. Housing Act of 1937 that is authorized to engage in or assist in the development or operation of low-income housing.
(6) (A) The Department of Labor shall disclose, upon request, to officers or employees of the Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) and to representatives of a public housing agency any wage information and unemployment compensation benefit information that is contained in its records with respect to an identified individual applying for or participating in any housing assistance program administered by HUD that is necessary for the purposes of determining the individual’s eligibility for benefits or the amount of benefits under a HUD housing assistance program. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term “public housing agency” means any agency described in section 3(b)(6) of the U.S. Housing Act of 1937 that is authorized to engage in or assist in the development or operation of low-income housing.

HUD or the requesting public housing agency shall agree that the requested information shall be used only for purposes of determining individual’s eligibility for benefits or the amount of benefits under a HUD housing assistance program and that it will comply with the provisions of 20 C.F.R. § 603.7 and the limitations on the use of the information set forth in section 904(c)(2) of P.L. 100-628.

The information requested shall not be released unless the individual about whom the requested information relates has signed a consent form, approved by the Secretary of HUD, which permits the release of the requested information.

The information requested shall not be released unless HUD or the requesting public housing agency agrees to reimburse the Department of Labor for the costs involved in furnishing the requested information.

The Department of Labor shall disclose, upon request, to officers and employees of the Vermont Center for Crime Victim Services, with respect to an identified individual, the name and address of the individual’s employer.
(7) (A) The Department of Labor shall disclose, upon request, to officers and employees of the Vermont Center for Crime Victim Services, with respect to an identified individual, the name and address of the individual’s employer.

The Center and the Department shall develop an agreement that complies with 20 C.F.R. § 603.6, and the Center shall comply with the confidentiality requirements of 20 C.F.R. § 603.7.

Subdivision (e)(8) effective until July 1, 2026; see also subdivision (e)(8) effective July 1, 2026 set out below.The Department of Labor shall disclose, upon request:

to the Attorney General and employees of the Office of the Attorney General, information necessary for the Attorney General to investigate a complaint and enforce the provisions of this chapter as provided pursuant to section 1379 of this chapter; and

to the Commissioners of Financial Regulation and of Taxes and employees of the Departments of Financial Regulation and of Taxes, information necessary to investigate misclassification or miscoding of workers under the insurance and tax laws that are under their jurisdiction.

(8)

Subdivision (e)(8) effective July 1, 2026; see also subdivision (e)(8) effective until July 1, 2026 set out above.

[Repealed.]

Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to interfere with the disclosure of certain information obtained under this chapter as provided in sections 1315, 1316, and 1317 of this title or to interfere with disclosure to the Internal Revenue Service of the U.S. Department of the Treasury or to any state for purposes of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act or for the purposes of taxation of unemployment compensation benefits paid to individuals by this Department. Information may be exchanged with the Vermont Department of Taxes for the purpose of establishing liability of employers for unemployment compensation purposes or identifying employers affected by Vermont tax laws. Information reported to the Department of Labor may be provided to the Vermont Department of Taxes for the purposes of assessment and collection of Vermont taxes, including identifying nonfilers of the State tax; locating and identifying persons in debt to the Department of Taxes; and verifying eligibility for tax credits, tax adjustments, or other tax benefits.

All written or oral reports, or other communications, from an employer or his or her workers to each other, or to the Commissioner or any of his or her agents, representatives, or employees, made in connection with the requirements and administration of this chapter or the regulations thereunder, shall be absolutely privileged and shall not be made the subject matter or basis for any suit for slander or libel in any court of this State, unless they are false in fact and malicious in intent.

Any employing unit that fails to report employment and separation information with respect to a claimant and wages paid to a claimant required under subsection (b) of this section shall be subject to a penalty of $100.00 for each report not received by the prescribed due date, which penalty shall be collected in the manner provided for the collection of contributions in section 1329 of this title and shall be paid into the contingent fund provided in section 1365 of this title. If the employing unit demonstrates that its failure was due to a reasonable cause, the Commissioner may waive the penalty.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1965, No. 26

, eff. April 14, 1965;

1967, No. 89

;

1973, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.);

1975, No. 62

, § 1, eff. April 18, 1975;

1979, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Jan. 1, 1980;

1981, No. 66

, § 5(a), eff. May 1, 1981;

1981, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1985, No. 50

, §§ 4, 5;

1987, No. 278

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 21, 1988;

1989, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1991, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 34, eff. May 7, 1992;

1993, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 63

, §§ 19, 19a, eff. Sept. 1, 1997;

2003, No. 70

(Adj. Sess.), § 63, eff. March 1, 2004;

2003, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2005, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2009, No. 54

, § 69a, eff. June 1, 2009;

2009, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2009, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2011, No. 50

, § 7, eff. May 26, 2011;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 125;

2013, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § E.400;

2015, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § H.3, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2017, No. 74

, § 48;

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Feb. 20, 2020;

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. July 1, 2026;

2021, No. 20

, § 220.

§ 1314a.
Quarterly wage reporting; misclassification; penalties.

Each employing unit that is an employer that has individuals in employment as defined in subdivision 1301(6) of this chapter shall file with the Commissioner on forms supplied by the Commissioner a detailed wage report for each calendar quarter that contains each individual worker’s name, Social Security number, gross wages paid during each calendar quarter, and any other information the Commissioner deems necessary in the administration of this chapter.
(a) (1) Each employing unit that is an employer that has individuals in employment as defined in subdivision 1301(6) of this chapter shall file with the Commissioner on forms supplied by the Commissioner a detailed wage report for each calendar quarter that contains each individual worker’s name, Social Security number, gross wages paid during each calendar quarter, and any other information the Commissioner deems necessary in the administration of this chapter.

In addition to other information required by this section, the wage reports required by this subsection shall include for each worker paid by the hour the worker’s gender and the worker’s hourly wage.

Reports required by subsection (a) of this section shall be filed with the Commissioner by the last day of the calendar month following the calendar quarter for which the report is submitted.

An employing unit that is not an employer shall, upon request of the Commissioner, submit reports on forms furnished by the Commissioner regarding employment, wages, hours of employment, unemployment, and related matters that the Commissioner deems necessary in the administration of this chapter.

Reports required by subsection (c) of this section shall be submitted to the Commissioner not later than 10 calendar days after the date the Commissioner’s request was mailed to the employing unit.

On request of the Commissioner, any employing unit or employer shall report, within 10 days of the mailing or personal delivery of the request, separation information for a claimant, any disqualifying income the claimant may have received, and any other information that the Commissioner may require to determine the claimant’s eligibility for unemployment compensation. The Commissioner shall make a request when:

the claimant’s eligibility is dependent upon:

wages paid during an incomplete calendar quarter in which the claimant was separated; or

the last completed quarter; and

obtaining the information will result in more timely benefit payments.

Any employing unit or employer that fails to:
(f) (1) Any employing unit or employer that fails to:

File a report required by this section shall be subject to an administrative penalty of $100.00 for each report not received by the prescribed due dates.

Properly classify an individual regarding the status of employment shall be subject to an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000.00 for each improperly classified employee. In addition, an employer found to have violated this section is prohibited from contracting, directly or indirectly, with the State or any of its subdivisions for up to three years following the date the employer was found to have failed to properly classify, as determined by the Commissioner in consultation with the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or the Secretary of Transportation, as appropriate. Either the Secretary or the Commissioner, as appropriate, shall be consulted in any appeal relating to prohibiting the employer from contracting with the State or its subdivisions.

Penalties under this subsection (f) shall be collected in the same manner as contributions under section 1329 of this title and shall be paid into the Contingent Fund established in section 1365 of this title.
(2) (A) Penalties under this subsection (f) shall be collected in the same manner as contributions under section 1329 of this title and shall be paid into the Contingent Fund established in section 1365 of this title.

If the employing unit demonstrates that its failure was due to a reasonable cause, the Commissioner may waive or reduce the penalty.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the Commissioner may, where practicable, require any employing unit to file the reports required pursuant to subsections (a) through (d) of this section, or any departmental registration required prior to submitting the reports required by this section, in an electronic media form.
(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the Commissioner may, where practicable, require any employing unit to file the reports required pursuant to subsections (a) through (d) of this section, or any departmental registration required prior to submitting the reports required by this section, in an electronic media form.

The Commissioner may waive the requirement that an employing unit submit a report in an electronic media form if the employing unit attests that it is unable to file the required report in that form.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 50

, § 6; amended

1985, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1987, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 26, 1988;

1989, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. May 18, 2000;

2001, No. 56

, § 1;

2009, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2013, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2019, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. July 1, 2020.

§ 1315.
State-federal cooperation.

In the administration of this chapter, the Commissioner shall cooperate to the fullest extent consistent with the provisions thereof, with the Secretary of Labor; shall make such reports, in such form and containing such information as the Secretary of Labor may from time to time require, and shall comply with such provisions as the Secretary of Labor may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports; and shall comply with the regulations prescribed by the Secretary of Labor governing the expenditures of such sums as may be allotted and paid to this State under Title III of the Social Security Act for the purpose of assisting in the administration of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.